District of Columbia statutes.
7-1721.05

Package requirements.

(a)

No person shall sell or distribute to any person within the District of Columbia any cigarettes except in packages containing no less than 20 cigarettes.

(b)

This section does not apply to a tobacco specialty store.

(1)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $500 nor less than $100, imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both, for the first offense. Any person convicted of a subsequent violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $1,000 nor less than $500, imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

(d)

Any license to sell cigarettes or other tobacco product issued pursuant to § 47-2404 may be suspended for a first or second violation of subsection (a) of this section. The license shall be revoked for a third or subsequent violation of subsection (a) of this section.

History

Feb. 7, 1891, 26 Stat. 736, ch. 117, § 6
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 3(d), 57 DCR 3019

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1721.07.